Ohio, session 136, HB841.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF OHIO: Section 1. That section 3701.68 of the Revised Code be enacted to read as follows: Sec. 3701.68. (A) As used in this section, "mold" means any form of multi-cellular fungi in indoor environments, including Cladosporium, penicillium, alternaria, aspergillus, fusarium, Trichoderma, Chaetomium, memnoniella, mucor, and stachybotrys chartarum, that are often found in water-damaged indoor environments and building materials. (B) The director of health shall establish a mold, lead, radon, and carbon monoxide information and awareness program to assist the public in understanding the threat of mold, lead, radon, and carbon monoxide in buildings and the importance of the proper remediation of that mold, lead, radon, and carbon monoxide. As part of the program, the director shall do both of the following: (1) Every five years, review technology or treatment techniques for mold, lead, radon, and carbon monoxide identification and remediation that provide additional protections to public health and safety. As part of the review for mold, the director shall consider mold remediation treatment techniques established by the institute of inspection cleaning and restoration certification and approved by the American national standards institute (ANSI) in the S520 standard for professional mold remediation, or its successor publication. The review shall be performed in accordance with rules adopted under this section and include an examination of any new scientific evidence that indicates that mold, lead, radon, and carbon monoxide may present a greater health risk to the public than previously determined. (2) Establish a public awareness campaign on the dangers of mold, lead, radon, and carbon monoxide in accordance with rules adopted under this section. As part of the campaign, the director shall disseminate information via digital brochures and the department of health's web site. (C) The director shall adopt rules in accordance with Chapter 119. of the Revised Code establishing both of the following: (1) Requirements and procedures for the review required under division (B)(1) of this section; (2) Requirements and procedures for the public awareness campaign established under division (B)(2) of this section. The rules shall ensure that the campaign educates the public on the health effects of mold, lead, radon, and carbon monoxide; methods of identification and remediation of mold, lead, radon, and carbon monoxide; and contact information for organizations or government agencies that can assist the public with their concerns. Section 2. (A) As used in this section, "mold" has the same meaning as in section 3720.01 of the Revised Code. (B) The Department of Health shall study any adverse effects to humans from exposure to mold in damp and water-damaged buildings. The Department shall consult with scientific research institutions and organizations with expertise on the adverse health effects from exposure to mold. (C) Not later than one year after the effective date of this section, the Department shall submit its findings to the General Assembly. Section 3. This act shall be known as the Healthy Homes Program Act.